Utah statutes.
9-4-1503.   Methamphetamine Housing Reconstruction and Rehabilitation Fund
-- Creation -- Interest -- Use of contributions and interest.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Methamphetamine Housing Reconstruction and Rehabilitation Fund.
(2)  The fund shall be funded by:
(a)  contributions deposited into the fund in accordance with Section
59-10-1314; and
(b)  interest described in Subsection (3).
(3) (a)  The fund shall earn interest.
(b)  Interest earned on the fund shall be deposited into the fund.
(4) (a)  The division shall distribute contributions and interest deposited
into the fund to one or more qualified housing organizations.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (4)(b)(ii), a qualified housing organization
that receives a distribution from the division in accordance with Subsection
(4)(a) shall expend the distribution to:
(A)  reconstruct or rehabilitate one or more residences that are:
(I)  sold to low-income persons selected by the qualified housing organization
in accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized by this section;
and
(II)  financed with loans that are not subject to interest as determined by
the qualified housing organization in accordance with any rules the division
makes as authorized by this section; or
(B)  purchase property upon which a residence described in Subsection
(4)(b)(i)(A) is reconstructed or rehabilitated.
(ii)  A qualified housing organization may not expend a distribution the
qualified housing organization receives in accordance with this Subsection (4)
for any administrative cost relating to an expenditure authorized by
Subsection (4)(b)(i).
(5) (a)  In accordance with any rules the division makes as authorized under
Subsection (6)(c), a qualified housing organization may apply to the division
to receive a distribution under Subsection (4).
(b)  A qualified housing organization may apply to the division to receive a
distribution under Subsection (4) by filing an application with the division:
(i)  on or before November 1; and
(ii)  on a form provided by the division.
(c)  The application:
(i)  shall include information required by the division establishing that the
qualified housing organization owns each residence with respect to which the
qualified housing organization plans to expend a distribution under Subsection
(4);
(ii)  shall include information required by the division establishing the
qualified housing organization's plan to expend the distribution for a purpose
described in Subsection (4)(b)(i);
(iii)  shall include information required by the division establishing that
the qualified housing organization's plan to expend the distribution meets
conditions established in accordance with Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 9, Illegal
Drug Operations Site Reporting and Decontamination Act, for a local health
department to remove the residence from the local health department's
decontamination list; and
(iv)  may include other information the division requires by rule.
(d)  The division shall determine on or before the November 30 immediately
following the November 1 described in Subsection (5)(b) whether a qualified
housing organization's application to the division meets the requirements of
Subsection (5)(c).
(e) (i)  The division shall distribute money credited to the fund to each
qualified housing organization that meets the requirements of Subsection
(5)(c) as determined by the division:
(A)  on or before the December 31 immediately following the November 1
described in Subsection (5)(b); and
(B)  in accordance with this Subsection (5)(e).
(ii)  The division shall determine:
(A)  the population of the county in which a qualified housing organization
that meets the requirements of Subsection (5)(c) is headquartered; and
(B)  the total population of all of the counties in which the qualified
housing organizations that meet the requirements of Subsection (5)(c) are
headquartered.
(iii)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(e)(iv), the division shall
determine a qualified housing organization's distribution by making the
following calculation:
(A)  calculating a percentage determined by dividing the population of the
county in which the qualified housing organization that meets the requirements
of Subsection (5)(c) is headquartered by the population calculated under
Subsection (5)(e)(ii)(B); and
(B)  multiplying the percentage determined under Subsection (5)(e)(iii)(A) by
the fund balance.
(iv)  If two or more qualified housing organizations that meet the
requirements of Subsection (5)(c) as determined by the division are
headquartered within one county, the division shall determine each qualified
housing organization's distribution by:
(A)  making the calculation required by Subsection (5)(e)(iii); and
(B)  dividing the amount calculated under Subsection (5)(e)(iii) by the number
of qualified housing organizations that meet the requirements of Subsection
(5)(c) as determined by the division that are headquartered within the county.
(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division may make rules:
(a)  to define what constitutes:
(i)  a low-income person;
(ii)  a loan that is not subject to interest; or
(iii)  an apartment or other rental unit;
(b)  for determining the circumstances under which real property is
appurtenant to a residence;
(c)  prescribing information a qualified housing organization is required to
include with an application under Subsection (5);
(d)  for purposes of Subsection (5)(e), for determining the population of a
county; or
(e)  for determining the county in which a qualified housing organization is
headquartered.
